North Dakota, session 69, HB1254.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 4 of section 54-24-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
4. Make library materials available to libraries throughout the state, to individuals connected with
departments of state, and to citizens of North Dakota who do not have adequate library
facilities, under the rules of the state library.

H. B. NO. 1254 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1254.
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 0 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State